Maine, session 132, LD1086.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 17 MRSA §1837-A, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2021, c. 136, §8, is further
amended to read:
2. Raffle with a prize of $2,500 or less. Except for raffles conducted by an eligible
organization under subsection 7, a A person or organization is not required to register with
the Gambling Control Unit to conduct a raffle in which the total value of the prize offered
to the holder of the winning chance does not exceed $2,500. If the raffle is conducted in a
manner in which there are multiple winning chances, the total value of all prizes offered
may not exceed a value of $2,500.
Sec. 2. 17 MRSA §1837-A, sub-§7, as amended by PL 2021, c. 636, §2, is further
amended to read:
7. Internet raffles; restrictions. An eligible organization described in section 1832,
subsection 2 may conduct a raffle in which the total value of all prizes offered is greater
than $2,500 described in subsection 2‑A or subsection 4 as an Internet raffle if the eligible
organization registers with the Gambling Control Unit and the Internet raffle is operated in
accordance with the requirements of this chapter by an Internet raffle operator identified
on the registration form. Notwithstanding subsection 6, an eligible organization may not
conduct more than one Internet raffle at the same time. The eligible organization and
Internet raffle operator may not permit a person under 18 years of age to purchase a chance
or ticket for an Internet raffle and may not advertise or market the Internet raffle in a manner
that has a high likelihood of reaching persons under 18 years of age or that is specifically
designed to appeal particularly to persons under 18 years of age. An eligible organization
is not required to register with the Gambling Control Unit to conduct an Internet raffle in
which the total value of the prize or prizes offered to the holder of the winning chance or
to the holders of the winning chances does not exceed $2,500 pursuant to subsection 2.
Sec. 3. 17 MRSA §1837-B, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 136, §11, is amended
to read:
1. License and approval required. A person may not operate an Internet raffle unless
the person is licensed as an Internet raffle operator under subsection 2, the Internet raffle is
conducted on behalf of an eligible organization registered under section 1837‑A, subsection
7, each payment for a chance or ticket for the Internet raffle is made through an Internet
raffle system approved under subsection 4 and the winning chance or chances are selected
by an Internet raffle system approved under subsection 4. This section does not apply to
an eligible organization described in section 1832, subsection 2 that conducts an Internet
raffle in which the total value of the prize or prizes offered to the holder of the winning
chance or to the holders of the winning chances does not exceed $2,500 pursuant to section
1837-A, subsection 2.